Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB278.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "public body" in section 2 of the act of December 12, 1986 (P.L.1559, No.169), known as the Whistleblower Law, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Public body." All of the following:* * *(2.1) The Supreme Court, Superior Court, Commonwealth Court, court of common pleas, minor judiciary or other body 123456789101112131415161718192021 in the judicial branch of State government.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0278PN0231 - 2 - 123